Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 109, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 24, O.S.L. 2024 (43 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 109), is amended to read as follows:
Section 109. A. Except as provided in subsection I of this
section and Section 112.2 of this title and unless otherwise agreed
to by the parents, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by a
preponderance of the evidence, that joint legal custody, joint
physical custody, and shared parenting time is in the best interest
of the child. In awarding granting the custody of a minor unmarried
child or in appointing a general guardian for the child, the court
shall consider what appears to be in the best interests of the
physical and, mental, and moral welfare of the child.
B. The court, pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of
this section, may grant the care, custody, and control of a child to
either parent or to the parents jointly or, if the presumption is
rebutted, to one parent.
For the purposes of this section, the terms joint custody and
joint care, custody, and control mean the sharing by parents in all
or some of the aspects of physical and legal care, custody, and
control of their children.
C. If either or both parents have requested joint custody, the
The parents shall file with the court their plans for the exercise
of joint care, custody, and control of their child. The parents of
the child may submit a plan jointly, or either parent or both
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pare nts may submit separate plans. Any plan shall include, but is
not be limited to, provisions detailing the physical living
arrangements for the child, child support obligations, medical and
dental care for the child, child care or day care for the child,
school placement, and visitation and parenting time rights. A plan
shall be accompanied by an affidavit signed by each parent stating
that the parent agrees to the plan and will abide by its terms. The
plan and affidavit shall be filed with the petition for a divorce or
legal separation or after the petition is filed.
D. The court shall issue a final plan for the exercise of joint
care, custody, and control of the child or children, based upon the
plan submitted by the parents, separate or jointly, with appropriate
changes deemed by the court to be in the best interests of the
child. The court also may reject a request for joint custody and
proceed as if the request for joint custody had not been made.
E. The parents having joint custody of the child may modify the
terms of the plan for joint care, custody, and control. The
modification to the plan shall be filed with the court and included
with the plan. If the court determines the modifications are in the
best interests of the child, the court shall approve the
modifications.
F. The court also may modify the terms of the plan for joint
care, custody, and control upon the request of one parent. The

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cour t shall not modify the plan unless the modifications are in the
best interests of the child.
G. 1. The court may terminate a joint custody decree upon the
request of one or both of the parents or whenever the court
determines the decree is not in the best interests of the child.
2. Upon termination of a joint custody decree, the court shall
proceed and issue a modified decree for the care, custody, and
control of the child as if no such joint custody decree had been
made.
H. In the event of a dispute between the parents having joint
custody of a child as to the interpretation of a provision of the
plan, the court may appoint an arbitrator to resolve the dispute.
The arbitrator shall be a disinterested person knowledgeable in
domestic relations law, child well-being, and family counseling.
The determination of the arbitrator shall be final and binding on
the parties to the proceedings until further order of the court.
If a parent refuses to consent to arbitration, the court may
terminate the joint custody decree.
I. 1. In every proceeding in which there is a dispute as to
the custody of a minor child, a determination by the court supported
by a preponderance of the evidence that child abuse, domestic
violence, stalking, or harassment has occurred raises a rebuttable
presumption, rebuttable by clear and convincing evidence, that sole
custody, joint legal or physical custody, or any shared parenting
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

time or plan with the perpetrator of child abuse, domestic violence,
harassing, or stalking behavior is detrimental to and not in the
best interest of the child, and it is in the best interest of the
child to reside with the parent who is not a perpetrator of child
abuse, domestic violence, harassing, or stalking behavior.
2. For the purposes of this subsection:
a. “child abuse” shall have the same meaning as “abuse”
as defined pursuant to the Oklahoma Children’s Code in
Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
b. “domestic violence” means the threat of the infliction
of physical injury, any act of physical harm or the
creation of a reasonable fear thereof, or the
intentional infliction of emotional distress by a
parent or a present or former member of the household
of the child, against the child or another member of
the household including coercive control by a parent
involving physical, sexual, psychological, emotional,
economic, or financial abuse,
c. “harassment” means a knowing and willful course or
pattern of conduct by a parent directed at another
parent which seriously alarms or is a nuisance to the
person, and which serves no legitimate purpose
including, but not limited to, harassing or obscene
telephone calls or conduct that would cause a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

reasonable person to have a fear of death or bodily
injury, and
d. “stalking” means the willful course of conduct by a
parent who repeatedly follows or harasses another
person as defined in Section 1173 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
3. If a parent is absent or relocates as a result of an act of
domestic violence by the other parent, the absence or relocation
shall not be a factor that weighs against the parent in determining
custody or visitation.
4. The court shall consider, as a primary factor, the safety
and well-being of the child who is the victim of child abuse and of
the parent who is the victim of domestic violence, harassment, or
stalking behavior, in addition to other facts regarding the best
interest of the child.
5. The court shall consider the history of the parent causing
physical harm, bodily injury, assault, verbal threats, stalking, or
harassing behavior, or the fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or
assault to another person including the minor child, in determining
issues regarding custody and visitation.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 110.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 110.1. It is the policy of this state to assure that
minor children have frequent and continuing contact with parents who
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

have shown the ability to act in the best interests of their
children and to encourage parents to share in the rights and
responsibilities of rearing their children after the parents have
separated or dissolved their marriage. The court may consider
evidence of the ability of the parents to cooperate on issues
related to their minor children, as well as evidence of child abuse,
domestic violence, stalking, or harassment as defined in paragraph 2
of subsection I of Section 109 of this title. To effectuate this
policy, if requested by a parent, the court may shall provide
substantially equal access to the minor children to both parents at
a temporary order or final hearing, unless the court finds that
shared parenting would be detrimental to the child. The court shall
issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law to support its
decision after a final hearing on the merits.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 112, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 112. A. A petition or cross-petition for a divorce,
legal separation, or annulment must state whether or not the parties
have minor children of the marriage. If there are minor children of
the marriage, the court:
1. Shall make provision for guardianship, custody, medical
care, support, and education of the children;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Unless not in the best interests of the children, may shall
provide for the visitation of the noncustodial parent with any of
the children of the noncustodial parent; and
3. May modify or change any order whenever circumstances render
the change proper either before or after final judgment in the
action; provided, that the amount of the periodic child support
payment shall not be modified retroactively or payment of all or a
portion of the past due amount waived, except by mutual agreement of
the obligor and obligee, or if the obligee has assigned child
support rights to the Department of Human Services or other entity,
by agreement of the Department or other entity. Unless the parties
agree to the contrary, a completed child support computation form
provided for in Section 120 of this title shall be required to be
filed with the child support order.
The social security numbers of both parents and the child shall
be included on the child support order summary form provided for in
Section 120 of this title, which shall be submitted to the Central
Case Registry central case registry as provided for in Section 112A
of this title with all child support or paternity orders.
B. In any action in which there are minor unmarried children,
in awarding granting or modifying the custody of the child or in
appointing a general guardian for the child, the court shall be
guided by the provisions of Section 112.5 of this title and shall
consider what appears to be in the best interests of the child.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. 1. When it is in the best interests of a minor unmarried
child, the court shall:
a. assure children of frequent and continuing contact
with both parents after the parents have separated or
dissolved their marriage, and
b. encourage parents to share the rights and
responsibilities of child rearing in order to effect
this policy.
2. There shall be neither a legal preference nor a presumption
for or against, rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence, that
joint legal custody, joint physical custody, or sole custody and
shared parenting time is in the best interest of the child. If the
presumption is rebutted, the court shall issue written findings of
fact and conclusions of law that support its decision and appoint a
guardian ad litem pursuant to Section 107.3 of this title to assist
the court in constructing a parenting time schedule that is
consistent with the best interest of the child and maximizes the
time each parent has with the child.
3. When in the best interests of the child, custody shall be
awarded granted in a way which assures ensures the frequent and
continuing contact of the child with both parents. When awarding
granting custody to either parent, the court:
a. shall consider, among other facts, which parent is
more likely to allow the child or children frequent
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and continuing contact with the noncustodial parent,
and
b. shall not prefer a parent as a custodian of the child
because of the gender of that parent.
4. In any action, there shall be neither a legal preference or
a presumption for or against private or public school or home-
schooling in awarding granting the custody of a child, or in
appointing a general guardian for the child.
5. Notwithstanding any custody determination made pursuant to
the Oklahoma Children’s Code, when a parent of a child is required
to be separated from a child due to military service, the court
shall not enter a final order modifying an existing custody order
until such time as the parent has completed the term of duty
requiring separation. For purposes of this paragraph:
a. in the case of a parent who is a member of the Army,
Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard, the
term “military service” means a combat deployment,
contingency operation, or natural disaster requiring
the use of orders that do not permit any family member
to accompany the member,
b. in the case of a parent who is a member of the
National Guard, the term “military service” military
service means service under a call to active service
authorized by the President of the United States or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the Secretary of Defense for a period of more than
thirty (30) consecutive days under 32 U.S.C., Section
502(f) for purposes of responding to a national
emergency declared by the President and supported by
federal funds. “Military service” Military service
shall include any period during which a member is
absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds,
leave, or other lawful cause, and
c. the court may enter a temporary custody or visitation
order pursuant to the requirements of the Deployed
Parents Custody and Visitation Act.
6. In making an order for custody, the court shall require
compliance with Section 112.3 of this title.
D. 1. Except for good cause shown, a pattern of failure to
allow court-ordered visitation may be determined to be contrary to
the best interests of the child and as such may be grounds for
modification of the child custody order.
2. For any action brought pursuant to the provisions of this
section which the court determines to be contrary to the best
interests of the child, the prevailing party shall be entitled to
recover court costs, attorney fees, and any other reasonable costs
and expenses incurred with the action.
E. Except as otherwise provided by Section 112.1A of this
title, any child shall be entitled to support by the parents until
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. If a child is
regularly enrolled in and attending high school, as set forth in
Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, other means
of high school education, or an alternative high school education
program as a full-time student, the child shall be entitled to
support by the parents until the child graduates from high school or
until the age of twenty (20) years, whichever occurs first. Full-
time attendance shall include regularly scheduled breaks from the
school year. No hearing or further order is required to extend
support pursuant to this subsection after the child reaches the age
of eighteen (18) years.
F. In any case in which provision is made for the custody or
support of a minor child or enforcement of such order and before
hearing the matter or signing any orders, the court shall inquire
whether public assistance money or medical support has been provided
by the Department of Human Services, hereafter referred to as the
Department, for the benefit of each child. If public assistance
money, medical support, or child support services under the state
child support plan as provided in Section 237 of Title 56 of the
Oklahoma Statutes have been provided for the benefit of the child,
the Department shall be a necessary party for the adjudication of
the debt due to the State of Oklahoma, as defined in Section 238 of
Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and for the adjudication of
paternity, child support, and medical insurance coverage for the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mino r children in accordance with federal regulations. When an
action is filed, the petitioner shall give the Department notice of
the action according to Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. The Department shall not be required to intervene in the
action to have standing to appear and participate in the action.
When the Department is a necessary party to the action, any orders
concerning paternity, child support, medical support, or the debt
due to the State of Oklahoma shall be approved and signed by the
Department.
G. In any case in which a child support order or custody order
or both is entered, enforced, or modified, the court may make a
determination of the arrearages of child support.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 112.2, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 34, O.S.L. 2024 (43 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 112.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 112.2. A. In every case involving the custody of,
guardianship of, or visitation with a child, the court shall
consider for determining the custody of, guardianship of, or the
visitation with a child whether any person seeking custody or who
has custody of, guardianship of, or visitation with a child:
1. Is or has been subject to the registration requirements of
the Sex Offenders Registration Act or any similar act in any other
state;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Has been convicted of a crime listed in the Oklahoma Child
Abuse Reporting and Prevention Act or in Section 582 of Title 57 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Is an alcohol-dependent person or a drug-dependent person as
established by clear and convincing evidence and who can be expected
in the near future to inflict or attempt to inflict serious bodily
harm to himself or herself or another person as a result of such
dependency;
4. Has been convicted of domestic abuse within the past five
(5) years;
5. Is residing with an individual who is or has been subject to
the registration requirements of the Sex Offenders Registration Act
or any similar act in any other state;
6. Is residing with a person who has been convicted of a crime
listed in the Oklahoma Child Abuse Reporting and Prevention Act or
in Section 582 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Is residing with a person who has been convicted of domestic
abuse within the past five (5) years; or
8. Has had custody, guardianship, or visitation rights
terminated due to failure to complete or participate in any court-
ordered substance abuse or mental health treatment.
B. There shall be a rebuttable presumption, rebuttable by clear
and convincing evidence, that it is not in the best interests of the
child to have custody or guardianship granted to a person who:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Is subject to or has been subject to the registration
requirements of the Sex Offenders Registration Act or any similar
act in any other state;
2. Has been convicted of a crime listed in the Oklahoma Child
Abuse Reporting and Prevention Act or in Section 582 of Title 57 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Is an alcohol-dependent person or a drug-dependent person as
established by clear and convincing evidence and who can be expected
in the near future to inflict or attempt to inflict serious bodily
harm to himself or herself or another person as a result of such
dependency;
4. Has been convicted of domestic abuse within the past five
(5) years;
5. Is residing with a person who is or has been subject to the
registration requirements of the Sex Offenders Registration Act or
any similar act in any other state;
6. Is residing with a person who has been convicted of a crime
listed in the Oklahoma Child Abuse Reporting and Prevention Act or
in Section 582 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Is residing with a person convicted of domestic abuse within
the past five (5) years; or
8. Has had custody, guardianship, or visitation rights
terminated due to failure to complete or participate in any court-
ordered substance abuse or mental health treatment.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Custody of, guardianship of, or visitation with a child
shall not be granted to any person if it is established that the
custody, guardianship, or visitation will likely expose the child to
a foreseeable risk of material harm.
D. Except as otherwise provided by the Oklahoma Child
Supervised Visitation Program, court-ordered supervised visitation
shall be governed by the Oklahoma Child Supervised Visitation
Program.
E. For purposes of this section:
1. “Alcohol-dependent person” has the same meaning as such term
is defined in Section 3-403 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Domestic abuse” has the same meaning as such term is
defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. “Drug-dependent person” has the same meaning as such term is
defined in Section 3-403 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
4. “Supervised visitation” means a program established pursuant
to Section 110.1a of this title.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 112.5, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2025 (43 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 112.5), is amended to read as follows:
Section 112.5. A. Custody or guardianship of a child may be
awarded granted to:
1. A parent or to both parents jointly;
2. A grandparent;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. A person who was indicated by the wishes of a deceased
parent;
4. A relative of either parent;
5. The person in whose home the child has been living in a
wholesome and stable environment including, but not limited to, a
foster parent; or
6. Any other person deemed by the court to be suitable and able
to provide adequate and proper care and guidance for the child.
B. In applying subsection A of this section, a court shall
award grant custody or guardianship of a child to a parent, unless a
nonparent proves by clear and convincing evidence that:
1. For a period of at least twelve (12) months out of the last
fourteen (14) months immediately preceding the commencement of the
custody or guardianship proceeding, the parent has willfully failed,
refused, or neglected to contribute to the support of the child:
a. in substantial compliance with a support provision or
an order entered by a court of competent jurisdiction
adjudicating the duty, amount, and manner of support,
or
b. according to the financial ability of the parent to
contribute to the support of the child if no provision
for support is entered by a court of competent
jurisdiction, or an order of modification subsequent
thereto.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

For purposes of this paragraph, incidental or token financial
contributions shall not be considered in establishing whether a
parent has satisfied his or her obligation under subparagraphs a and
b of this paragraph; or
2. a. the The child has been left in the physical custody of
a nonparent by a parent or parents of the child for
one (1) year or more, excluding parents on active duty
in the military, and
b. the The parent or parents have not maintained regular
visitation or communication with the child.
For purposes of this paragraph, incidental or token visits or
communications shall not be considered in determining whether a
parent or parents have regularly maintained visitation or
communication.
C. In applying subsection A of this section, a court shall
award grant custody or guardianship of a child to a parent, unless
the court finds that the parent is affirmatively unfit. There shall
be a rebuttable presumption, rebuttable by clear and convincing
evidence, that a parent is affirmatively unfit if the parent:
1. Is or has been subject to the registration requirements of
the Oklahoma Sex Offenders Registration Act or any similar act in
any other state, except as provided in subsection D of this section;
2. Has been convicted of a crime listed in Section 582 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Is an alcohol-dependent person or a drug-dependent person as
established by clear and convincing evidence and who can be expected
in the near future to inflict or attempt to inflict serious bodily
harm to himself or herself or another person as a result of such
dependency;
4. Has been convicted of domestic abuse within the past five
(5) years;
5. Is residing with a person who is or has been subject to the
registration requirements of the Oklahoma Sex Offenders Registration
Act or any similar act in any other state;
6. Is residing with a person who has been convicted of a crime
listed in Section 843.5 of Title 21 or in Section 582 of Title 57 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Is residing with a person who has been convicted of domestic
abuse within the past five (5) years; or
8. Has been convicted of a crime listed in the Oklahoma Child
Abuse Reporting and Prevention Act.
D. In applying subsection A of this section, a court shall not
award grant custody or guardianship of a child to any person who has
been convicted, whether upon a verdict or plea of guilty or upon a
plea of nolo contendere, or received a suspended sentence or any
probationary term, or is currently serving a sentence or any form of
probation or parole in a court in any state of for any of the
following crimes:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Sexual abuse or sexual exploitation of a child, as provided
in Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Child endangerment, if the offense involved sexual abuse of
a child, as provided in Section 852.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. Kidnapping, if the offense involved sexual abuse or sexual
exploitation of a child, as provided in Section 741 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Incest, as provided in Section 885 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Forcible sodomy of a child, as provided in Section 888 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Child stealing, if the offense involved sexual abuse or
sexual exploitation, as provided in Section 891 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Procuring minors for participation in child sexual abuse
material, as provided in Section 1021.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
8. Consent to participation of minors in child sexual abuse
material, as provided in Section 1021.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
9. Facilitating, encouraging, offering, or soliciting sexual
conduct with a minor by use of technology, as provided in Section
1040.13a of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10. Distributing child sexual abuse material, as provided in
Section 1040.13 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Possession, purchase, or procurement of child sexual abuse
material, as provided in Section 1024.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
12. Aggravated possession of child sexual abuse material, as
provided in Section 1040.12a of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Procuring a child under eighteen (18) years of age for
prostitution, child sex trafficking as provided in Section 1087 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Inducing, keeping, detaining, or restraining a child under
eighteen (18) years of age for prostitution, child sex trafficking
as provided in Section 1088 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. First degree rape, as provided in Section 1114 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Lewd or indecent proposals or acts to a child under sixteen
(16) years of age, as provided in Section 1123 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; or
17. Solicitation of minors in any crime provided in subsection
B of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. Subject to subsection F of this section, a custody
determination made in accordance with subsections B and C of this
section shall not be modified unless the person seeking the
modification proves that:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Since the making of the order sought to be modified, there
has been a permanent, material, and substantial change of conditions
that directly affects the best interests of the child; and
2. That as a result of such change of circumstances, the child
would be substantially better off with regard to its his or her
temporal, mental, and moral welfare if custody were modified.
F. If the custody determination made in accordance with
subsections B and C of this section indicates that custody is
temporary, the determination may be modified upon a showing that the
conditions which led to the custody or guardianship determination no
longer exist.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2027.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 14, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1082 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)